services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.aff
FLAG num
SFX 218 Y 87
SFX 218 0 0 .
SFX 218 0 ño .
SFX 218 0 ño/1,385 .
SFX 218 0 a .
SFX 218 0 ak .
SFX 218 0 an .
SFX 218 0 arekin .
SFX 218 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 aren .
SFX 218 0 arendako .
SFX 218 0 arentzat .
SFX 218 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 218 0 ari .
SFX 218 0 az .
SFX 218 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 218 0 dun .
SFX 218 0 dun/1,371 .
SFX 218 0 ei .
SFX 218 0 ek .
SFX 218 0 ekin .
SFX 218 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 en .
SFX 218 0 endako .
SFX 218 0 entzat .
SFX 218 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 218 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 218 0 ez .
SFX 218 0 gatik .
SFX 218 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 gile .
SFX 218 0 gile/1,360 .
SFX 218 0 k .
SFX 218 0 ka .
SFX 218 0 ka/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 ko .
SFX 218 0 koa .
SFX 218 0 koak .
SFX 218 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 218 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 218 0 oi .
SFX 218 0 ok .
SFX 218 0 okin .
SFX 218 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 on .
SFX 218 0 ontzat .
SFX 218 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 218 0 otaz .
SFX 218 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 218 0 oz .
SFX 218 0 pe .
SFX 218 0 pe/1,377 .
SFX 218 0 ra .
SFX 218 0 raino .
SFX 218 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 rantz .
SFX 218 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 218 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 rat .
SFX 218 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 218 0 rekin .
SFX 218 0 reki/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 ren .
SFX 218 0 rendako .
SFX 218 0 rentzat .
SFX 218 0 rentza/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 ren/1,369 .
SFX 218 0 re/1,380 .
SFX 218 0 ri .
SFX 218 0 rik .
SFX 218 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 218 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 218 0 tik .
SFX 218 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 tsu .
SFX 218 0 tsu/1,359 .
SFX 218 0 txo .
SFX 218 0 txo/1,385 .
SFX 218 0 tzar .
SFX 218 0 tzarr/1,387 .
SFX 218 0 tzar/1,383 .
SFX 218 0 tzat .
SFX 218 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 218 0 z .
SFX 218 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 219 Y 38
SFX 219 0 0 .
SFX 219 0 ak .
SFX 219 0 ei .
SFX 219 0 ek .
SFX 219 0 ekin .
SFX 219 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 eko .
SFX 219 0 eko/1,391 .
SFX 219 0 en .
SFX 219 0 endako .
SFX 219 0 entzat .
SFX 219 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 219 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 219 0 ez .
SFX 219 0 ez/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 219 0 garren .
SFX 219 0 garren/1,395 .
SFX 219 0 gatik .
SFX 219 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 i .
SFX 219 0 ik .
SFX 219 0 na .
SFX 219 0 naka .
SFX 219 0 naka/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 na/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 oi .
SFX 219 0 ok .
SFX 219 0 okin .
SFX 219 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 on .
SFX 219 0 ontzat .
SFX 219 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 219 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 219 0 otaz .
SFX 219 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 219 0 oz .
SFX 289 Y 75
SFX 289 0 0 .
SFX 289 0 a .
SFX 289 0 ago .
SFX 289 0 ago/1,428 .
SFX 289 0 ak .
SFX 289 0 arekin .
SFX 289 0 areki/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 aren .
SFX 289 0 arendako .
SFX 289 0 arentzat .
SFX 289 0 arentza/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 aren/1,412 .
SFX 289 0 ari .
SFX 289 0 az .
SFX 289 0 a/1,375 .
SFX 289 0 dun .
SFX 289 0 dun/1,429 .
SFX 289 0 ean .
SFX 289 0 egi .
SFX 289 0 egi/1,428 .
SFX 289 0 ei .
SFX 289 0 ek .
SFX 289 0 ekin .
SFX 289 0 eki/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 eko .
SFX 289 0 eko/1,416 .
SFX 289 0 en .
SFX 289 0 endako .
SFX 289 0 entzat .
SFX 289 0 entza/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 en/1,430 .
SFX 289 0 era .
SFX 289 0 eraino .
SFX 289 0 eraino/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 erantz .
SFX 289 0 erantz/1,414 .
SFX 289 0 eranz/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 erat .
SFX 289 0 era/1,417 .
SFX 289 0 er/1,418 .
SFX 289 0 eta/1,413 .
SFX 289 0 etik .
SFX 289 0 eti/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 ez .
SFX 289 0 ez/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 e/1,380 .
SFX 289 0 gatik .
SFX 289 0 gati/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 i .
SFX 289 0 ik .
SFX 289 0 ki .
SFX 289 0 ki/1,374 .
SFX 289 0 oi .
SFX 289 0 ok .
SFX 289 0 okin .
SFX 289 0 oki/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 on .
SFX 289 0 ontzat .
SFX 289 0 ontza/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 on/1,412 .
SFX 289 0 otaz .
SFX 289 0 ota/1,413 .
SFX 289 0 oz .
SFX 289 0 pe .
SFX 289 0 pe/1,431 .
SFX 289 0 tasun .
SFX 289 0 tasun/1,432 .
SFX 289 0 txo .
SFX 289 0 txo/1,433 .
SFX 289 0 tzar .
SFX 289 0 tzarr/1,434 .
SFX 289 0 tzar/1,435 .
SFX 289 0 tzat .
SFX 289 0 tza/1,411 .
SFX 289 0 xe/1,436 .
SFX 288 Y 5
SFX 288 0 0 .
SFX 288 0 ago .
SFX 288 0 ago/1,368 .
SFX 288 0 egi .
SFX 288 0 egi/1,368 .
SFX 4 Y 2
SFX 4 0 araz .
SFX 4 0 araz/1,362 .
SFX 281 Y 55
SFX 281 0 0 .
SFX 281 0 a .
SFX 281 0 ak .
SFX 281 0 an .
SFX 281 0 arekin .
SFX 281 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 aren .
SFX 281 0 arendako .
SFX 281 0 arentzat .
SFX 281 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 281 0 ari .
SFX 281 0 au .
SFX 281 0 az .
SFX 281 0 a/1,370 .
SFX 281 0 ei .
SFX 281 0 ek .
SFX 281 0 ekin .
SFX 281 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 en .
SFX 281 0 endako .
SFX 281 0 entzat .
SFX 281 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 281 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 281 0 ez .
SFX 281 0 ko .
SFX 281 0 koa .
SFX 281 0 koak .
SFX 281 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 281 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 281 0 oi .
SFX 281 0 ok .
SFX 281 0 okin .
SFX 281 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 on .
SFX 281 0 ontzat .
SFX 281 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 on/1,419 .
SFX 281 0 ori .
SFX 281 0 orr/1,420 .
SFX 281 0 otaz .
SFX 281 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 281 0 oz .
SFX 281 0 ra .
SFX 281 0 raino .
SFX 281 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 rantz .
SFX 281 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 281 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 281 0 rat .
SFX 281 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 281 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 281 0 tik .
SFX 281 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 280 Y 17
SFX 280 0 an .
SFX 280 0 ko .
SFX 280 0 koa .
SFX 280 0 koak .
SFX 280 0 koa/1,375 .
SFX 280 0 ko/1,376 .
SFX 280 0 ra .
SFX 280 0 raino .
SFX 280 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 280 0 rantz .
SFX 280 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 280 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 280 0 rat .
SFX 280 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 280 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 280 0 tik .
SFX 280 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 283 Y 48
SFX 283 0 0 .
SFX 283 0 a .
SFX 283 0 ak .
SFX 283 0 arekin .
SFX 283 0 areki/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 aren .
SFX 283 0 arendako .
SFX 283 0 arentzat .
SFX 283 0 arentza/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 aren/1,369 .
SFX 283 0 ari .
SFX 283 0 az .
SFX 283 0 ean .
SFX 283 0 ei .
SFX 283 0 ek .
SFX 283 0 ekin .
SFX 283 0 eki/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 eko .
SFX 283 0 eko/1,376 .
SFX 283 0 en .
SFX 283 0 endako .
SFX 283 0 entzat .
SFX 283 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 en/1,369 .
SFX 283 0 era .
SFX 283 0 eraino .
SFX 283 0 eraino/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 erantz .
SFX 283 0 erantz/1,378 .
SFX 283 0 eranz/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 erat .
SFX 283 0 era/1,379 .
SFX 283 0 er/1,381 .
SFX 283 0 eta/1,373 .
SFX 283 0 etik .
SFX 283 0 eti/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 ez .
SFX 283 0 oi .
SFX 283 0 ok .
SFX 283 0 okin .
SFX 283 0 oki/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 on .
SFX 283 0 ontzat .
SFX 283 0 ontza/1,368 .
SFX 283 0 on/1,369 .
SFX 283 0 otaz .
SFX 283 0 ota/1,373 .
SFX 283 0 oz .
SFX 282 Y 36
SFX 282 0 0 .
SFX 282 0 k .
SFX 282 0 ko .
SFX 282 0 koa .
SFX 282 0 koak .
SFX 282 0 koa/1,370 .
SFX 282 0 ko/1,386 .
SFX 282 0 na .
SFX 282 0 naka .
SFX 282 0 naka/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 na/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 ra .
SFX 282 0 raino .
SFX 282 0 raino/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 rantz .
SFX 282 0 rantz/1,378 .
SFX 282 0 ranz/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 rat .
SFX 282 0 ra/1,379 .
SFX 282 0 rekin .
SFX 282 0 reki/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 ren .
SFX 282 0 rendako .
SFX 282 0 rentzat .
SFX 282 0 rentza/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 ren/1,369 .
SFX 282 0 ri .
SFX 282 0 rik .
SFX 282 0 r/1,381 .
SFX 282 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 282 0 tik .
SFX 282 0 ti/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 tzat .
SFX 282 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 282 0 z .
SFX 282 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 285 Y 30
SFX 285 0 0 .
SFX 285 0 garren .
SFX 285 0 garren/1,395 .
SFX 285 0 gatik .
SFX 285 0 gati/1,368 .
SFX 285 0 k .
SFX 285 0 ko .
SFX 285 0 koa .
SFX 285 0 koak .
SFX 285 0 koa/1,370 .
SFX 285 0 ko/1,392 .
SFX 285 0 na .
SFX 285 0 naka .
SFX 285 0 naka/1,368 .
SFX 285 0 na/1,368 .
SFX 285 0 rekin .
SFX 285 0 reki/1,368 .
SFX 285 0 ren .
SFX 285 0 rendako .
SFX 285 0 rentzat .
SFX 285 0 rentza/1,368 .
SFX 285 0 ren/1,369 .
SFX 285 0 re/1,380 .
SFX 285 0 ri .
SFX 285 0 rik .
SFX 285 0 ta/1,373 .
SFX 285 0 tzat .
SFX 285 0 tza/1,368 .
SFX 285 0 z .
SFX 285 0 z/1,368 .
SFX 284 Y 17
SFX 284 0 ei .
SFX 284 0 ei/1,421 .
SFX 284 0 ek .
SFX 284 0 ekin .
SFX 284 0 ekin/1,422 .
SFX 284 0 eki/1,423 .
SFX 284 0 en .
SFX 284 0 endako .
SFX 284 0 entzat .
SFX 284 0 entza/1,368 .
SFX 284 0 en/1,424 .
SFX 284 0 etaz .
SFX 284 0 eta/1,425 .
SFX 284 0 ex/1,426 .
SFX 284 0 ez .
SFX 284 0 ezaz .
SFX 284 0 e/1,427 .
