services/web/node_modules/@overleaf/dictionaries/dictionaries/eu.dic
-hondarr/1002,4,1
ñabarr/1002,4,1
ñapurr/1002,4,1
ñirñirr/1002,4,1
abarr/1002,4,1
adarr/1002,4,1
agerr/1002,4,1
agorr/1002,4,1
agurr/1002,4,1
ahakarr/1002,4,1
aiherr/1002,4,1
aitorr/1002,4,1
aitzurr/1002,4,1
akerr/1002,4,1
alditxarr/1002,4,1
alferr/1002,4,1
ankerr/1002,4,1
aparr/1002,4,1
apurr/1002,4,1
arabiarr/1002,4,1
arditzarr/1002,4,1
arnasbeharr/1002,4,1
asperr/1002,4,1
aterr/1002,4,1
azarr/1002,4,1
azkarr/1002,4,1
azkorr/1002,4,1
azterr/1002,4,1
bakarr/1002,4,1
baldarr/1002,4,1
baserritarr/1002,4,1
batzarr/1002,4,1
bazterr/1002,4,1
beakurr/1002,4,1
beharr/1002,4,1
belarr/1002,4,1
beldurr/1002,4,1
berragerr/1002,4,1
berrazterr/1002,4,1
berrindarr/1002,4,1
betekorr/1002,4,1
betikorr/1002,4,1
bidalkarr/1002,4,1
bihurr/1002,4,1
bilurr/1002,4,1
birsorr/1002,4,1
bizarr/1002,4,1
bizkarr/1002,4,1
bizkorr/1002,4,1
bi/218,1
bortz/219,1
bularr/1002,4,1
derrigorr/1002,4,1
desadarr/1002,4,1
desagerr/1002,4,1
desegonkorr/1002,4,1
desezurr/1002,4,1
desmilitarr/1002,4,1
desugerr/1002,4,1
desuztarr/1002,4,1
doilorr/1002,4,1
egonkorr/1002,4,1
egoskorr/1002,4,1
egurr/1002,4,1
ekorr/1002,4,1
eliztarr/1002,4,1
elkarr/1002,4,1
elkorr/1002,4,1
eltzagorr/1002,4,1
eltzarr/1002,4,1
elurr/1002,4,1
emankorr/1002,4,1
enborr/1002,4,1
endurr/1002,4,1
erezarr/1002,4,1
erregularr/1002,4,1
erromatarr/1002,4,1
eskerr/1002,4,1
espainiarr/1002,4,1
etarr/1002,4,1
europarr/1002,4,1
ezegonkorr/1002,4,1
ezilkorr/1002,4,1
ezkerr/1002,4,1
fierr/1002,4,1
gailurr/1002,4,1
gainulerr/1002,4,1
gandorr/1002,4,1
garr/1002,4,1
gazurr/1002,4,1
georgiarr/1002,4,1
giharr/1002,4,1
gizatarr/1002,4,1
gizatiarr/1002,4,1
gizatxarr/1002,4,1
goganbeharr/1002,4,1
gogarr/1002,4,1
gogorr/1002,4,1
gogotxarr/1002,4,1
goiarr/1002,4,1
gorr/1002,4,1
gotorr/1002,4,1
gozarr/1002,4,1
gurr/1002,4,1
gutarte/280,1
guzi/281,1
guzti/281,1
haidorr/1002,4,1
hainbertze/282,1
hainbeste/1002,282,1
hain/283,1
hai/284,1
hamabortz/219,1
hamaika/285,1
harabarr/1002,4,1
haraxerantz/288,1
haretxen/289,1
hartar/1002,4,1
harr/1002,4,1
haserrekorr/1002,4,1
hatsarr/1002,4,1
haurr/1002,4,1
hauskorr/1002,4,1
hausnarr/1002,4,1
herritarr/1002,4,1
hezurr/1002,4,1
hilezkorr/1002,4,1
hilkorr/1002,4,1
hiritarr/1002,4,1
hitzarr/1002,4,1
honaxerantz/288,1
hondarr/1002,4,1
honenbeste/282,1
honetxen/289,1
horrenbeste/282,1
horretxen/289,1
idorr/1002,4,1
iharr/1002,4,1
ikarakorr/1002,4,1
ikerr/1002,4,1
ikuskorr/1002,4,1
ilunabarr/1002,4,1
indarr/1002,4,1
irabiurr/1002,4,1
iragankorr/1002,4,1
irudikorr/1002,4,1
iruzurr/1002,4,1
itobeharr/1002,4,1
itxuratxarr/1002,4,1
izarr/1002,4,1
izporr/1002,4,1
izurr/1002,4,1
jasankorr/1002,4,1
jaunarr/1002,4,1
jeloskorr/1002,4,1
kabarr/1002,4,1
kaletarr/1002,4,1
kamerr/1002,4,1
kanpotarr/1002,4,1
kaskarr/1002,4,1
kedarr/1002,4,1
kixkorr/1002,4,1
kizkurr/1002,4,1
koldarr/1002,4,1
konkorr/1002,4,1
koskorr/1002,4,1
kotorr/1002,4,1
kuturr/1002,4,1
kuzkurr/1002,4,1
laburr/1002,4,1
laharr/1002,4,1
landerr/1002,4,1
langarr/1002,4,1
lapurr/1002,4,1
lasterr/1002,4,1
lazkarr/1002,4,1
leharr/1002,4,1
leherr/1002,4,1
leiarr/1002,4,1
limurr/1002,4,1
liskarr/1002,4,1
lixturr/1002,4,1
loakarr/1002,4,1
lokarr/1002,4,1
lorr/1002,4,1
lotsakorr/1002,4,1
lurrarr/1002,4,1
lurrunkorr/1002,4,1
lurr/1002,4,1
makarr/1002,4,1
makurr/1002,4,1
malgorr/1002,4,1
maltzurr/1002,4,1
mamorr/1002,4,1
mantarr/1002,4,1
marmarr/1002,4,1
maskurr/1002,4,1
menditarr/1002,4,1
militarr/1002,4,1
minkorr/1002,4,1
moxkorr/1002,4,1
mugerr/1002,4,1
muskerr/1002,4,1
muturr/1002,4,1
nabarr/1002,4,1
neskazaharr/1002,4,1
norr/1002,4,1
okerr/1002,4,1
onarr/1002,4,1
onbihurr/1002,4,1
orokorr/1002,4,1
ozarr/1002,4,1
partzuerr/1002,4,1
piltzarr/1002,4,1
piperr/1002,4,1
saporr/1002,4,1
sarr/1002,4,1
senarr/1002,4,1
sentikorr/1002,4,1
sorgorr/1002,4,1
sugarr/1002,4,1
sukarr/1002,4,1
susperr/1002,4,1
tontorr/1002,4,1
txanbihurr/1002,4,1
txarr/1002,4,1
txigorr/1002,4,1
txikorr/1002,4,1
txingarr/1002,4,1
txondorr/1002,4,1
ugerr/1002,4,1
ukurr/1002,4,1
uxterr/1002,4,1
uztarr/1002,4,1
zabarr/1002,4,1
zainarr/1002,4,1
zakurr/1002,4,1
zeharr/1002,4,1
zenbatsu/282,1
ziamarr/1002,4,1
zimurr/1002,4,1
zizkorr/1002,4,1
zoharr/1002,4,1
zoritxarr/1002,4,1
zuztarr/1002,4,1
